Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-906.03
Secretary of State; duties.

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State:

(1) To establish and cause to be compiled, indexed by subject, and published a codification system for all rules and regulations filed to be designated the Nebraska Administrative Code.

(2) To cause the Nebraska Administrative Code to be computerized to facilitate agencies in revision of their rules and regulations and provide research capabilities; and

(3) To distribute a current copy of existing rules and regulations as accepted by him or her as filed to the State Library and to each county law library of the State of Nebraska making a request for a copy of such rules and regulations; to distribute, on a regular basis, copies of all modifications or amendments to agency rules and regulations as accepted by him or her as filed to the State Library and to each county law library of the State of Nebraska which requests copies of all modifications or amendments; to distribute at least four current copies of any rules and regulations accepted by him or her as filed to the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse to meet the needs of the Nebraska publications depository system; to distribute on a regular basis at least four copies of all modifications or amendments to agency rules and regulations accepted by him or her as filed to the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse to meet the needs of the Nebraska publications depository system; to distribute a current copy of any existing rules and regulations as accepted by him or her as filed to all interested persons on request at a price fixed to cover costs of printing, handling, and mailing; and to distribute, on a regular basis, copies of any or all modifications or amendments to agency rules and regulations as accepted by him or her as filed to all interested persons on request at a price fixed to cover costs of printing, handling, and mailing.

Laws 1973, LB 134, § 6;

Laws 1975, LB 267, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 712, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 130, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 784, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 992, § 5.